Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5554XC (1) 91 as/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 915.10, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. âVictimâ means a person who has suffered physical, 3 emotional, or financial harm as the result of a public offense 4 or a delinquent act, other than a simple misdemeanor, committed 5 in this state. âVictimâ also includes the immediate family 6 members of a victim who died or was rendered incompetent as a 7 result of the offense or who was under eighteen years of age 8 at the time of the offense. A first responder, including law 9 enforcement, fire personnel, and emergency medical services 10 personnel, may also be considered a victim for purposes of 11 presenting a victim impact statement to the court at the time 12 of sentencing pursuant to section 915.21. 13